Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2374
Local hospital district; bond; surety; limitation.

The bond in substance shall be similar to the bond required and set forth in section 77-2304. No person in any way connected with any depository bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution as an officer or stockholder shall be accepted as a surety on any bond given by the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution of which he or she is an officer or stockholder.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 52;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 74.